Utah statutes.
41-1a-226.   Vintage vehicle -- Signed statement -- Registration
certificate.
The owner of a vintage vehicle applying for registration under this part shall
provide a signed statement certifying that the vintage vehicle is owned and
operated for the purposes enumerated in Section 41-21-1 and that the vintage
vehicle has been inspected and found safe to operate on the highways of this
state.
